Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. Wyoming Higher Education Loan Plan

Cross references. —

As to the family college savings program, see §

21-16-809

et seq.

§ 21-16-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 18, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 52, § 1, related to investment of permanent state funds in federally insured student loans.

§ 21-16-102.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

21-16-113

by Laws 1994, ch. 69, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions relating to investment in insured, guaranteed or other higher education loans, see §

21-16-113

.

§§ 21-16-103 through 21-16-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1994, ch. 69, § 1, related to the Wyoming higher education loan plan. For present similar provisions, see §§

21-16-701

through

21-16-722

.

§ 21-16-113.
Investment in insured, guaranteed or other higher education loans. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 18, § 1; 1987, ch. 24, § 1; 1989, ch. 71, § 1; 1991, ch. 220, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

21-16-102

; 1994, ch. 69, § 2; 1996, ch. 118, § 2; 1997, ch. 108, § 1; repealed by 2016 ch. 110, § 3, effective July 1, 2016.